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DTC P0500/42 Vehicle Speed Sensor ”A”

DTC P0503 Vehicle Speed Sensor ”A” Intermittent/
Erratic/High

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
TheNo. 1 vehiclespeedsensoroutputsa4 −pulsesignal forevery revolutionof the rotorshaft,which is ro-
tated by the transmission output shaft via the driven gear. After this signal is converted into a more precise
rectangular waveform by the waveform shaping circuit inside the combination meter, it is then transmitted
to the engine control ECU. The engine control ECU determines the vehicle speed based on the frequency
of these pulse signals.

DTCNo. Proceed to DTCDetectionCondition Trouble Area

P0500/42 Step 1

No vehicle speed sensor sig-
nal to engine control ECU un-
der following conditions (a)
and (b): ( 1 tripdetection logic)
(a)Park/neutralposition

switch is OFF
(b)Vehicle isbeingdriven

SCombinationmeter
SOpenorshort invehiclespeedsensorcircuit
SVehiclespeedsensor
SEnginecontrolECU

P0503 DI−3
Intermittent problem in the ve-
hicle speed sensor circuit

MONITOR DESCRIPTION
The engine control ECU assumes that the vehicle is being driven when the engine RPM is more than 2,000
rpmand thePark/NeutralPosition (PNP)switchwas turnedOFF(for 10seconds). If there isnosignal from
the VSS when the vehicle is being driven, the engine control ECU interprets this as a malfunction in the VSS.
The engine control ECU illuminates the MIL and sets a DTC.
Thismonitor runswhenall of followingconditionsaremet for 10secondsormore.
S Engine iswarmed −up(Enginecoolant temperature is20 ˚ C(68 ˚ F)ormore)
S EngineRPMis2,000 rpmormore
S Dshift position
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WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:
Read freeze framedatausing thehand −held tester.Freeze framedata records theengineconditionswhen
a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
runningorstopped, if theenginewaswarmedupornot, if theair −fuel ratiowas leanor rich,aswell asother
data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

1 Checkoperationofspeedometer.

CHECK:
Drive the vehicle and check if the operation of the speedometer in the combination meter is normal.
HINT:
The vehicle speed is operating normally if the speedometer display is normal.

NG Check speedometer circuit. See combination
meter troubleshooting.

OK
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2CheckvoltagebetweenterminalSPDandE 1 ofenginecontrolECUconnector.

PREPARATION:
(a) Shift the shift lever to neutral.
(b) Jack up the rear wheel on one side.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between the specified terminal of the E9
and E 10 engine control ECU connector when the wheel is
turnedslowly.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

SPD(E 10−17) − E1 (E9−1) Generated intermittently

HINT:
The output voltage should fluctuate up and down similarly to the
diagram on the left when the wheel is turned slowly.

NG Check and repair harness and connector be-
tween combination meter and engine control
ECU.

OK

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E,pageFI −74).


